Rhode Island statutes. Title 31 Motor and Other Vehicles
Chapter 10.2 Voluntary Termination of Operators’ and Chauffeurs’ Licenses

31-10.2-1.
Purpose.

The department of revenue, division of motor vehicles, presently lacks the authority to allow the voluntary termination of operators’ and chauffeurs’ licenses by an individual. It is the intent of this chapter to establish rules and regulations regarding the voluntary termination of operators’ and chauffeurs’ licenses in this state. Pursuant to §§

31-2-4

, 42-35-3(b), and 42-35-4(b)(2), the department of revenue shall adopt and establish the following rules and regulations regarding voluntary termination of operators’ and chauffeurs’ licenses. Any and all regulations previously promulgated for this purpose are rescinded.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 10; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 10.

31-10.2-2.
Operators’ licenses.

An individual may voluntarily terminate his or her operators’ license by tendering the license to the operator control section of the department of revenue, division of motor vehicles.

Should an individual terminate his or her operators’ license, the individual may not reapply for a new operators’ license for a period of six (6) months from the date of the voluntary license termination.

Before an individual may voluntarily terminate his or her license, the individual must sign an affidavit as established by the division of motor vehicles, notifying the individual of the consequences of voluntary license termination.

Upon reapplication for an operators’ license following voluntary termination by an individual, the individual shall be required to take a written test and a road test, but shall not pay the required reinstatement fee as established by the operator control division before the granting of a new operators’ license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 86, § 85; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 10; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 10.

31-10.2-3.
Chauffeur’s licenses.

An individual may voluntarily terminate his or her chauffeur’s license by tendering the license to the operator control section of the department of revenue, division of motor vehicles.

Should the individual terminate his or her chauffeur’s license, the individual may not reapply for a new chauffeur’s license for a period of one year from the date of the voluntary license termination.

Before an individual may voluntarily terminate his or her license, the individual must sign an affidavit as established by the division of motor vehicles, notifying the individual of the consequences of voluntary license termination.

Upon reapplication for a chauffeur’s license following voluntary termination by an individual, the individual shall be required to take a written test and a road test, but shall not pay the required reinstatement fee as established by the operator control division before the granting of a new chauffeur’s license.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 342, § 1; P.L. 2008, ch. 98, § 10; P.L. 2008, ch. 145, § 10.

31-10.2-4.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or its application to any person or circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this chapter, which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end, the provisions of this chapter are declared to be severable.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 342, § 1.